Hawaii statutes.
§157-25 Proceedings to review. The
action of the board of agriculture in refusing to grant or renew a license, or
in revoking or suspending a license, or in conditioning or limiting the
granting or renewal of a license, may be reviewed in the manner provided by
chapter 91. [L 1967, c 260, §16; HRS §157-25]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next